District of Columbia statutes.
16-2364

Unlawful disclosure.

Whoever willfully discloses, receives, makes use of, or knowingly permits the use of information concerning a child or other person in violation of section 16-2363 of this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned for not more than ninety (90) days, or both. A violation of this section shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 281(e), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 16-2364.
1973 Ed., § 16-2364.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250)”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 281(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.